Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF749.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.67, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 41. new text end new text begin School supplies. new text end new text begin (a) All school supplies are exempt. new text end new text begin (b) For the purposes of this section, "school supplies" includes but is not limited to binders, calculators, cellophane tape, blackboard chalk, compasses, composition books, crayons, erasers, folders, glue, paste, glue sticks, highlighters, index cards, index card boxes, legal pads, lunch boxes, markers, notebooks, poster board, construction paper, graph paper, tracing paper, manila paper, copy paper, loose-leaf ruled paper, colored paper, pencil boxes, school supply boxes, pencil sharpeners, pencils, pens, protractors, rulers, scissors, and writing tablets. Book bags having a retail price of $60 or less are school supplies. new text end new text begin (c) School supplies does not include paper products not used primarily in school work, such as stationery and wrapping paper; adhesive products not generally used in a school setting by children; or backpacks designed primarily for hiking or camping. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025. new text end